Washington statutes.
RCW 36.73.050

Establishment of district—Public hearing—Ordinance.

(1) The legislative authorities proposing to establish a district, or to modify the boundaries of an existing district, or to dissolve an existing district shall conduct a hearing at the time and place specified in a notice published at least once, not less than ten days before the hearing, in a newspaper of general circulation within the proposed district. Subject to the provisions of RCW 36.73.170, the legislative authorities shall make provision for a district to be automatically dissolved when all indebtedness of the district has been retired and anticipated responsibilities have been satisfied. This notice shall be in addition to any other notice required by law to be published. The notice shall, where applicable, specify the functions or activities proposed to be provided or funded, or the additional functions or activities proposed to be provided or funded, by the district. Additional notice of the hearing may be given by mail, by posting within the proposed district, or in any manner the legislative authorities deem necessary to notify affected persons. All hearings shall be public and the legislative authorities shall hear objections from any person affected by the formation, modification of the boundaries, or dissolution of the district.

(2)(a) Following the hearing held pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the legislative authorities may establish a district, modify the boundaries or functions of an existing district, or dissolve an existing district, if the legislative authorities find the action to be in the public interest and adopt an ordinance providing for the action.

(b) The ordinance establishing a district shall specify the functions and transportation improvements described under RCW 36.73.015 to be exercised or funded and establish the boundaries of the district. Subject to the provisions of RCW 36.73.160, functions or transportation improvements proposed to be provided or funded by the district may not be expanded beyond those specified in the notice of hearing, unless additional notices are made, further hearings on the expansion are held, and further determinations are made that it is in the public interest to so expand the functions or transportation improvements proposed to be provided or funded.

[ 2007 c 329 s 3; 2005 c 336 s 5; 1987 c 327 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 336: See note following RCW 36.73.015.